Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
OFFICERS

7-108-301. Officers.

A corporation shall have the officers designated in its bylaws or by the board of directors. An officer shall be an individual who is eighteen years of age or older.

Officers may be appointed by the board of directors or in such other manner as the board of directors or bylaws may provide. A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one or more of the officers responsibility for the preparation and maintenance of minutes of the directors' and shareholders' meetings and other records and information required to be kept by the corporation under section 7-116-101 and for authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in the corporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1499, § 259, effective July 1.

7-108-302. Duties of officers.

Each officer shall have the authority and shall perform the duties stated with respect to the officer's office in the bylaws or, to the extent not inconsistent with the bylaws, prescribed with respect to that office by the board of directors or by an officer authorized by the board of directors.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2320, § 244, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1499, § 260, effective July 1.

7-108-303. Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by giving notice of resignation to the corporation.

A resignation of an officer is effective when the notice is received by the corporation unless the notice states a later effective date.

If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board of directors may permit the officer to remain in office until the effective date and may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective date, or the board of directors may remove the officer at any time before the effective date and may fill the resulting vacancy.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may remove any officer at any time with or without cause. The bylaws or the board of directors may make provision for the removal of officers by other officers or by the shareholders.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(5) amended, p. 978, § 59, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 1848, § 114, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1713, § 114, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2320, § 245, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(5) repealed, p. 1499, § 261, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 170, § 21, effective April 19.

7-108-304. Contract rights with respect to officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer's removal does not affect the officer's contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer's resignation does not affect the corporation's contract rights, if any, with the officer.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 786, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.